New.aff
# Cross product of far future tense subject markers (L) and object markers (F)
# Generated via script to handle chaining
PFX R Y 555
PFX R 0 ndimu .
PFX R 0 ndiba .
PFX R 0 ndigu .
PFX R 0 ndigi .
PFX R 0 ndizi .
PFX R 0 ndiki .
PFX R 0 ndibi .
PFX R 0 ndili .
PFX R 0 ndiga .
PFX R 0 ndika .
PFX R 0 ndibu .
PFX R 0 ndilu .
PFX R 0 ndiku .
PFX R 0 nditu .
PFX R 0 olin [^lmn]
PFX R l olind l.[^mn]
PFX R l olinn l.[mn]
PFX R w olimp [w]
PFX R 0 olimu .
PFX R 0 oliba .
PFX R 0 oligu .
PFX R 0 oligi .
PFX R 0 olizi .
PFX R 0 oliki .
PFX R 0 olibi .
PFX R 0 olili .
PFX R 0 oliga .
PFX R 0 olika .
PFX R 0 olibu .
PFX R 0 olilu .
PFX R 0 oliku .
PFX R 0 olitu .
PFX R 0 alin [^lmn]
PFX R l alind l.[^mn]
PFX R l alinn l.[mn]
PFX R w alimp [w]
PFX R 0 alimu .
PFX R 0 aliba .
PFX R 0 aligu .
PFX R 0 aligi .
PFX R 0 alizi .
PFX R 0 aliki .
PFX R 0 alibi .
PFX R 0 alili .
PFX R 0 aliga .
PFX R 0 alika .
PFX R 0 alibu .
PFX R 0 alilu .
PFX R 0 aliku .
PFX R 0 alitu .
PFX R 0 tulin [^lmn]
PFX R l tulind l.[^mn]
PFX R l tulinn l.[mn]
PFX R w tulimp [w]
PFX R 0 tulimu .
PFX R 0 tuliba .
PFX R 0 tuligu .
PFX R 0 tuligi .
PFX R 0 tulizi .
PFX R 0 tuliki .
PFX R 0 tulibi .
PFX R 0 tulili .
PFX R 0 tuliga .
PFX R 0 tulika .
PFX R 0 tulibu .
PFX R 0 tulilu .
PFX R 0 tuliku .
PFX R 0 tulitu .
PFX R 0 mulin [^lmn]
PFX R l mulind l.[^mn]
PFX R l mulinn l.[mn]
PFX R w mulimp [w]
PFX R 0 mulimu .
PFX R 0 muliba .
PFX R 0 muligu .
PFX R 0 muligi .
PFX R 0 mulizi .
PFX R 0 muliki .
PFX R 0 mulibi .
PFX R 0 mulili .
PFX R 0 muliga .
PFX R 0 mulika .
PFX R 0 mulibu .
PFX R 0 mulilu .
PFX R 0 muliku .
PFX R 0 mulitu .
PFX R 0 balin [^lmn]
PFX R l balind l.[^mn]
PFX R l balinn l.[mn]
PFX R w balimp [w]
PFX R 0 balimu .
PFX R 0 baliba .
PFX R 0 baligu .
PFX R 0 baligi .
PFX R 0 balizi .
PFX R 0 baliki .
PFX R 0 balibi .
PFX R 0 balili .
PFX R 0 baliga .
PFX R 0 balika .
PFX R 0 balibu .
PFX R 0 balilu .
PFX R 0 baliku .
PFX R 0 balitu .
PFX R 0 abalin [^lmn]
PFX R l abalind l.[^mn]
PFX R l abalinn l.[mn]
PFX R w abalimp [w]
PFX R 0 abalimu .
PFX R 0 abaliba .
PFX R 0 abaligu .
PFX R 0 abaligi .
PFX R 0 abalizi .
PFX R 0 abaliki .
PFX R 0 abalibi .
PFX R 0 abalili .
PFX R 0 abaliga .
PFX R 0 abalika .
PFX R 0 abalibu .
PFX R 0 abalilu .
PFX R 0 abaliku .
PFX R 0 abalitu .
PFX R 0 gulin [^lmn]
PFX R l gulind l.[^mn]
PFX R l gulinn l.[mn]
PFX R w gulimp [w]
PFX R 0 gulimu .
PFX R 0 guliba .
PFX R 0 guligu .
PFX R 0 guligi .
PFX R 0 gulizi .
PFX R 0 guliki .
PFX R 0 gulibi .
PFX R 0 gulili .
PFX R 0 guliga .
PFX R 0 gulika .
PFX R 0 gulibu .
PFX R 0 gulilu .
PFX R 0 guliku .
PFX R 0 gulitu .
PFX R 0 ogulin [^lmn]
PFX R l ogulind l.[^mn]
PFX R l ogulinn l.[mn]
PFX R w ogulimp [w]
PFX R 0 ogulimu .
PFX R 0 oguliba .
PFX R 0 oguligu .
PFX R 0 oguligi .
PFX R 0 ogulizi .
PFX R 0 oguliki .
PFX R 0 ogulibi .
PFX R 0 ogulili .
PFX R 0 oguliga .
PFX R 0 ogulika .
PFX R 0 ogulibu .
PFX R 0 ogulilu .
PFX R 0 oguliku .
PFX R 0 ogulitu .
PFX R 0 gilin [^lmn]
PFX R l gilind l.[^mn]
PFX R l gilinn l.[mn]
PFX R w gilimp [w]
PFX R 0 gilimu .
PFX R 0 giliba .
PFX R 0 giligu .
PFX R 0 giligi .
PFX R 0 gilizi .
PFX R 0 giliki .
PFX R 0 gilibi .
PFX R 0 gilili .
PFX R 0 giliga .
PFX R 0 gilika .
PFX R 0 gilibu .
PFX R 0 gililu .
PFX R 0 giliku .
PFX R 0 gilitu .
PFX R 0 egilin [^lmn]
PFX R l egilind l.[^mn]
PFX R l egilinn l.[mn]
PFX R w egilimp [w]
PFX R 0 egilimu .
PFX R 0 egiliba .
PFX R 0 egiligu .
PFX R 0 egiligi .
PFX R 0 egilizi .
PFX R 0 egiliki .
PFX R 0 egilibi .
PFX R 0 egilili .
PFX R 0 egiliga .
PFX R 0 egilika .
PFX R 0 egilibu .
PFX R 0 egililu .
PFX R 0 egiliku .
PFX R 0 egilitu .
PFX R 0 elin [^lmn]
PFX R l elind l.[^mn]
PFX R l elinn l.[mn]
PFX R w elimp [w]
PFX R 0 elimu .
PFX R 0 eliba .
PFX R 0 eligu .
PFX R 0 eligi .
PFX R 0 elizi .
PFX R 0 eliki .
PFX R 0 elibi .
PFX R 0 elili .
PFX R 0 eliga .
PFX R 0 elika .
PFX R 0 elibu .
PFX R 0 elilu .
PFX R 0 eliku .
PFX R 0 elitu .
PFX R 0 zilin [^lmn]
PFX R l zilind l.[^mn]
PFX R l zilinn l.[mn]
PFX R w zilimp [w]
PFX R 0 zilimu .
PFX R 0 ziliba .
PFX R 0 ziligu .
PFX R 0 ziligi .
PFX R 0 zilizi .
PFX R 0 ziliki .
PFX R 0 zilibi .
PFX R 0 zilili .
PFX R 0 ziliga .
PFX R 0 zilika .
PFX R 0 zilibu .
PFX R 0 zililu .
PFX R 0 ziliku .
PFX R 0 zilitu .
PFX R 0 ezilin [^lmn]
PFX R l ezilind l.[^mn]
PFX R l ezilinn l.[mn]
PFX R w ezilimp [w]
PFX R 0 ezilimu .
PFX R 0 eziliba .
PFX R 0 eziligu .
PFX R 0 eziligi .
PFX R 0 ezilizi .
PFX R 0 eziliki .
PFX R 0 ezilibi .
PFX R 0 ezilili .
PFX R 0 eziliga .
PFX R 0 ezilika .
PFX R 0 ezilibu .
PFX R 0 ezililu .
PFX R 0 eziliku .
PFX R 0 ezilitu .
PFX R 0 kilin [^lmn]
PFX R l kilind l.[^mn]
PFX R l kilinn l.[mn]
PFX R w kilimp [w]
PFX R 0 kilimu .
PFX R 0 kiliba .
PFX R 0 kiligu .
PFX R 0 kiligi .
PFX R 0 kilizi .
PFX R 0 kiliki .
PFX R 0 kilibi .
PFX R 0 kilili .
PFX R 0 kiliga .
PFX R 0 kilika .
PFX R 0 kilibu .
PFX R 0 kililu .
PFX R 0 kiliku .
PFX R 0 kilitu .
PFX R 0 ekilin [^lmn]
PFX R l ekilind l.[^mn]
PFX R l ekilinn l.[mn]
PFX R w ekilimp [w]
PFX R 0 ekilimu .
PFX R 0 ekiliba .
PFX R 0 ekiligu .
PFX R 0 ekiligi .
PFX R 0 ekilizi .
PFX R 0 ekiliki .
PFX R 0 ekilibi .
PFX R 0 ekilili .
PFX R 0 ekiliga .
PFX R 0 ekilika .
PFX R 0 ekilibu .
PFX R 0 ekililu .
PFX R 0 ekiliku .
PFX R 0 ekilitu .
PFX R 0 bilin [^lmn]
PFX R l bilind l.[^mn]
PFX R l bilinn l.[mn]
PFX R w bilimp [w]
PFX R 0 bilimu .
PFX R 0 biliba .
PFX R 0 biligu .
PFX R 0 biligi .
PFX R 0 bilizi .
PFX R 0 biliki .
PFX R 0 bilibi .
PFX R 0 bilili .
PFX R 0 biliga .
PFX R 0 bilika .
PFX R 0 bilibu .
PFX R 0 bililu .
PFX R 0 biliku .
PFX R 0 bilitu .
PFX R 0 ebilin [^lmn]
PFX R l ebilind l.[^mn]
PFX R l ebilinn l.[mn]
PFX R w ebilimp [w]
PFX R 0 ebilimu .
PFX R 0 ebiliba .
PFX R 0 ebiligu .
PFX R 0 ebiligi .
PFX R 0 ebilizi .
PFX R 0 ebiliki .
PFX R 0 ebilibi .
PFX R 0 ebilili .
PFX R 0 ebiliga .
PFX R 0 ebilika .
PFX R 0 ebilibu .
PFX R 0 ebililu .
PFX R 0 ebiliku .
PFX R 0 ebilitu .
PFX R 0 lilin [^lmn]
PFX R l lilind l.[^mn]
PFX R l lilinn l.[mn]
PFX R w lilimp [w]
PFX R 0 lilimu .
PFX R 0 liliba .
PFX R 0 liligu .
PFX R 0 liligi .
PFX R 0 lilizi .
PFX R 0 liliki .
PFX R 0 lilibi .
PFX R 0 lilili .
PFX R 0 liliga .
PFX R 0 lilika .
PFX R 0 lilibu .
PFX R 0 lililu .
PFX R 0 liliku .
PFX R 0 lilitu .
PFX R 0 elilin [^lmn]
PFX R l elilind l.[^mn]
PFX R l elilinn l.[mn]
PFX R w elilimp [w]
PFX R 0 elilimu .
PFX R 0 eliliba .
PFX R 0 eliligu .
PFX R 0 eliligi .
PFX R 0 elilizi .
PFX R 0 eliliki .
PFX R 0 elilibi .
PFX R 0 elilili .
PFX R 0 eliliga .
PFX R 0 elilika .
PFX R 0 elilibu .
PFX R 0 elililu .
PFX R 0 eliliku .
PFX R 0 elilitu .
PFX R 0 galin [^lmn]
PFX R l galind l.[^mn]
PFX R l galinn l.[mn]
PFX R w galimp [w]
PFX R 0 galimu .
PFX R 0 galiba .
PFX R 0 galigu .
PFX R 0 galigi .
PFX R 0 galizi .
PFX R 0 galiki .
PFX R 0 galibi .
PFX R 0 galili .
PFX R 0 galiga .
PFX R 0 galika .
PFX R 0 galibu .
PFX R 0 galilu .
PFX R 0 galiku .
PFX R 0 galitu .
PFX R 0 agalin [^lmn]
PFX R l agalind l.[^mn]
PFX R l agalinn l.[mn]
PFX R w agalimp [w]
PFX R 0 agalimu .
PFX R 0 agaliba .
PFX R 0 agaligu .
PFX R 0 agaligi .
PFX R 0 agalizi .
PFX R 0 agaliki .
PFX R 0 agalibi .
PFX R 0 agalili .
PFX R 0 agaliga .
PFX R 0 agalika .
PFX R 0 agalibu .
PFX R 0 agalilu .
PFX R 0 agaliku .
PFX R 0 agalitu .
PFX R 0 kalin [^lmn]
PFX R l kalind l.[^mn]
PFX R l kalinn l.[mn]
PFX R w kalimp [w]
PFX R 0 kalimu .
PFX R 0 kaliba .
PFX R 0 kaligu .
PFX R 0 kaligi .
PFX R 0 kalizi .
PFX R 0 kaliki .
PFX R 0 kalibi .
PFX R 0 kalili .
PFX R 0 kaliga .
PFX R 0 kalika .
PFX R 0 kalibu .
PFX R 0 kalilu .
PFX R 0 kaliku .
PFX R 0 kalitu .
PFX R 0 akalin [^lmn]
PFX R l akalind l.[^mn]
PFX R l akalinn l.[mn]
PFX R w akalimp [w]
PFX R 0 akalimu .
PFX R 0 akaliba .
PFX R 0 akaligu .
PFX R 0 akaligi .
PFX R 0 akalizi .
PFX R 0 akaliki .
PFX R 0 akalibi .
PFX R 0 akalili .
PFX R 0 akaliga .
PFX R 0 akalika .
PFX R 0 akalibu .
PFX R 0 akalilu .
PFX R 0 akaliku .
PFX R 0 akalitu .
PFX R 0 bulin [^lmn]
PFX R l bulind l.[^mn]
PFX R l bulinn l.[mn]
PFX R w bulimp [w]
PFX R 0 bulimu .
